apertium-tuk.tuk.lexc
LEXICON PRON-BIZ !  FIXME: Complete this paradigm

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:biz CLIT ; ! FIXME: standard is to have <nom>
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:biziň CLIT ; 
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:bize CLIT ; 
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:bizi CLIT ; 
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:bizde CLIT ; 
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<abl%>:bizden CLIT ; 

LEXICON PRON-SIZ !  FIXME: Complete this paradigm

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:siz CLIT ; ! FIXME: standard is to have <nom>
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:siziň CLIT ; 
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:size CLIT ; 
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:sizi CLIT ; 
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:sizde CLIT ; 
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<abl%>:sizden CLIT ; 

LEXICON PRON-OLAR ! FIXME: Complete this paradigm

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:olar CLIT ; ! FIXME: standard is to have <nom>
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:olaryň CLIT ; 
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:olara CLIT ; 
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:olary CLIT ; 
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:olarda CLIT ; 
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<abl%>:olardan CLIT ; 


LEXICON PRON-DEM-ŞU ! FIXME: Complete this paradigm

%<prn%>%<dem%>: # ;

LEXICON PRON-DEM-BU ! FIXME: Complete this paradigm

%<prn%>%<dem%>:bu # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<gen%>:munuň # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<dat%>:muňa # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<acc%>:muny # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:munda # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<abl%>:mundan # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>:bu%>l%{A%}r CASE ;

LEXICON PRON-DEM-ŞOL ! FIXME: Complete this paradigm

%<prn%>%<dem%>:l # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<gen%>:nuň # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<dat%>:na # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<acc%>:ny # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:nda # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<abl%>:ndan # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r CASE ;

LEXICON PRON-ITG ! FIXME: Complete this paradigm

%<prn%>%<itg%>: CASE ;

LEXICON PRON-REF ! FIXME: Complete this paradigm

%<prn%>%<ref%>: POSS ;

LEXICON PRON-IND ! FIXME: Complete this paradigm

%<prn%>%<ind%>: SUBST ;

LEXICON PRON-ADV ! FIXME: Complete this paradigm

%<prn%>%<adv%>: CASE ;

LEXICON DET-IND

%<det%>%<ind%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-DEM

%<det%>%<dem%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-QNT

%<det%>%<qnt%>: # ;

LEXICON ABBR

%<abbr%>: # ;

LEXICON INTERJ

%<ij%>: # ;

LEXICON CC

%<cnjcoo%>: # ;

LEXICON CS

%<cnjsub%>: # ;


LEXICON V-NONFIN-COMMON

! Gerunds
%<ger%>:%>m%{A%} SUBST ;
%<ger_abst%>:%>{Y%}ş SUBST ;
%<ger_impf%>:%>ý%{Ä%}n SUBST ;
%<ger_fut%>:%>j%{A%}g CLIT-COP ;

%<gpr_rsub%>:%>ý%{Ä%}n CLIT-COP ;
%<gpr_fut%>:%>j%{A%}g CLIT-COP ;

LEXICON V-NONFIN-NEG

%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} V-NONFIN-COMMON ; 
%<ger_inf%>:%>m%{A%}g SUBST ;
%<neg%>%<ger_inf%>:%>m%{A%}zl%{Y%}g SUBST ;
%<ger_past%>:%>%{A%}n SUBST ;
%<neg%>%<ger_past%>:%>m%{A%}d%{Y%}g SUBST ;
%<gpr_past%>:%>%{A%}n CLIT-COP ;
%<neg%>%<gpr_past%>:%>m%{A%}d%{Y%}g SUBST ;

V-NONFIN-COMMON ; 

LEXICON V-NONFIN

! Gerunds

! Participles
%<prc_perf%>:%>%{y%}p CLIT-COP ;
%<neg%>%<prc_perf%>:%>m%{Ä%}n CLIT-COP ;

! Verbal adverbs
%<gna_perf%>:%>%{y%}p CLIT-COP ;
%<neg%>%<gna_perf%>:%>m%{Ä%}n CLIT-COP ;


V-NONFIN-NEG ; 

LEXICON V-FIN-COMMON

%<ifi%>:%>d%{U%} V-PERS-G2 ;
%<ifi%>%<evid%>:%>%{y%}pd%{U%} V-PERS-G2 ;
%<imp%>: V-PERS-G3 ;
%<cond%>:%>s%{A%} V-PERS-G2 ;
%<prog%>:%>ý%{Ä%}r V-PERS-G1 ;
%<pres%>:%>ý%{Ä%} V-PERS-G5 ;
%<fut%>:%>j%{A%}g V-PERS-G2 ;
%<nec%>:%>m%{A%}l%{Y%} V-PERS-G2 ; 
%<aor%>:%>%{A%}r V-PERS-G2 ;  ! FIXME: check this form, does {A} delete after vowel ?
%<evid%>:%>%{y%}pd%{Y%}r V-PERS-G1 ; 

LEXICON V-FIN-NEG 

%<aor%>:%>m%{A%}z V-PERS-G2 ; 
%<evid%>:%>m%{Ä%}nd%{Y%}r V-PERS-G1 ; 
%<perf%>:%>%{ä%} V-PERS-G4 ; 

LEXICON V-NEG 

%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} V-FIN-COMMON ; 
%<neg%>: V-FIN-NEG ; 
V-FIN-COMMON ; 

LEXICON V-COMMON

V-NONFIN ; 
V-NEG ; 

LEXICON V-IV 

%<v%>%<iv%>: V-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>:%>%{d%}%{Y%}%{r%} V-COMMON;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>%<pass%>:%>%{d%}%{Y%}r%>%{y%}%{l%} V-COMMON;

LEXICON V-TV 
! Causative + Passive
! Causative + Cooperative
! Cooperative + Causative

%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{y%}%{l%} V-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>:%>%{d%}%{Y%}%{r%} V-COMMON;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>%<pass%>:%>%{d%}%{Y%}%{r%}%>%{y%}%{l%} V-COMMON;

LEXICON V-IV-NOCAUS

%<v%>%<iv%>: V-COMMON ;

LEXICON V-TV-NOCAUS

%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{y%}%{l%} V-COMMON ;

LEXICON V-IV-CAUS ! For 'irregular/fossilised' causatives of intransitive verbs

%<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>: V-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>%<pass%>:%>%{y%}%{l%} V-COMMON ;

LEXICON V-TV-CAUS ! For 'irregular/fossilised' causatives of transitive verbs

%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>: V-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>%<pass%>:%>%{y%}%{l%} V-COMMON ;

LEXICON VAUX-IMPF 

%<vaux%>%<prog%>: V-PERS-G2 ; 

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!                                                                           !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Modals

eken:eken MOD-EKEN ; ! ""
welin:welin MOD ; ! "still"
welin:weli MOD ; ! "still" ! Dir/LR
ahyry:ahyry MOD ; ! "after all"
ayry:ayry MOD ; ! "after all" ! Dir/LR
belki:belki MOD ; ! "maybe"

mi:mi QST ; ! ""

LEXICON Conjunctions 

we:we CC ; ! "and"
hem:hem CC ; ! "and"
ýada:ýada CC ; ! "or"
da:da CC ; ! "and, also" ! Dir/LR
da:de CC ; ! "and, also" ! Dir/LR
ýöne:ýöne CC ; ! "however"
emma:emma CC ; ! "but"
ýa:ýa CC ; ! "or"

eger:eger CS ; ! "if"

LEXICON Postpositions ! FIXME: All "postpositions" need to be checked

bilen:bilen POST ; ! "with"
üçin:üçin POST ; ! ""
gabat:gabat POST ; ! "against"
garşy:garşy POST ; ! "against"
barada:barada POST ; ! "about"
görä:görä POST ; ! "by comparison to"
çenli:çenli POST ; ! "until"
soňra:soňra POST ; ! "after"
boýunça:boýunça POST ; ! "according to"
degişli:degişli POST ; ! "concerning, in relation to"
üsti% bilen:üsti% üsti POST ; ! "via, by way of"
hakynda:hakynda POST ; ! "about"


LEXICON Postadverbs

ýaly:ýaly POSTADV ; ! "like, as"

LEXICON Pronouns 

men: PRON-MEN ; ! "I"
sen: PRON-SEN ; ! "thou"
ol: PRON-OL ; ! "he/she/it"
biz: PRON-BIZ ; ! "we"
siz: PRON-SIZ ; ! "you"
olar: PRON-OLAR ; ! "they"

şu:şu PRON-DEM-ŞU ; ! ""
bu: PRON-DEM-BU ; ! ""
şol:şo PRON-DEM-ŞOL ; ! ""
hol:ho PRON-DEM-ŞOL ; ! ""

näme:näme PRON-ITG ; ! "what?"
kim:kim PRON-ITG ; ! "who?"
nire:nire PRON-ITG ; ! 

öz:öz PRON-REF ; ! "own, self"

o% ýer:o% ýer PRON-ADV ; ! 

başga:başga PRON-IND ; ! "other"
hemme:hemme PRON-IND ; ! "all"
ähli:ähli PRON-IND ; ! "all"

LEXICON Determiners

bir:bir DET-IND ; ! "a"
başga:başga DET-IND ; ! "other"
beýleki:beýleki DET-IND ; ! "the other"
hemme:hemme DET-IND ; ! "all"
ähli:ähli DET-IND ; ! "all"
her:her DET-IND ; ! "every"
hiç:hiç DET-IND ; ! ""

bu:bu DET-DEM ; ! ""
şu:şu DET-DEM ; ! ""

köp:köp DET-QNT ; ! "a lot"
kän:kän DET-QNT ; ! "a lot, much"
bütin:bütin DET-QNT ; ! "whole, all"
käbir:käbir DET-QNT ; ! "some"
az:az DET-QNT ; ! "few"
birnäçe:birnäçe DET-QNT ; ! "some"
şonça:şonça DET-QNT ; ! "so much, so many"
her:her DET-QNT ; ! ""

LEXICON Numerals

bir:bir NUM ; ! "one"
iki:iki NUM ; ! "two"
üç:üç NUM ; ! "three"
dört:dört NUM ; ! "four"
bäş:bäş NUM ; ! "five"
alty:alty NUM ; ! "six"
ýedi:ýedi NUM ; ! "seven"
sekiz:sekiz NUM ; ! "eight"
dokuz:dokuz NUM ; ! "nine"
on:on NUM ; ! "ten"

ýigrimi:ýigrimi NUM ; ! "twenty"
otuz:otuz NUM ; ! "thirty"
kyrk:kyrk NUM ; ! "fourty"
elli:elli NUM ; ! "fifty"
altmyş:altmyş NUM ; ! "sixty"
ýetmiş:ýetmiş NUM ; ! "seventy"
segsen:segsen NUM ; ! "eighty"
togsan:togsan NUM ; ! "ninety"
ýüz:ýüz NUM ; ! "hundred"

müň:müň NUM ; ! "thousand"
million:million NUM ; ! "million" ! FIXME: Should be noun ?

ilki:ilki NUM ; ! "first" ! FIXME: Should be ordinal by default ?
soňky:soňky NUM ; ! "last" ! FIXME: Should be ordinal by default ? 
golaý:golaý NUM ; ! "next" ! FIXME: Should be ordinal by default ?

LEXICON Interjections

ýok:ýok INTERJ ; ! "" 
hawa:hawa INTERJ ; ! "" 
elbetde:elbetde INTERJ ; ! "" 

LEXICON Abbreviations

km:km ABBR ; ! "" 
sm:sm ABBR ; ! "" 
mm:mm ABBR ; ! "" 
gr:gr ABBR ; ! "" 
kg:kg ABBR ; ! ""
mln:mln ABBR ; ! ""

LEXICON Verbs
otur:otur V-IV ; ! "sit"
ýat:ýad V-IV-NOCAUS ; ! "to lie down"
ýat%<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>:ýatyr V-COMMON ; ! "lay down, put to bed"
dur:dur V-IV ; ! ""
ýör:ýör V-IV ; ! ""
ýör:ýör V-IV ; ! ""
ýat:ýatyr VAUX-IMPF ; ! "" 
otur:otyr VAUX-IMPF ; ! "" 
dur:dur VAUX-IMPF ; ! "" 
ýör:ýör VAUX-IMPF ; ! "" 
ýap:ýap V-TV ; ! "do"
beýt:beýd V-TV ; ! "do"
gözle:gözle V-TV ; ! "look for"
al:al V-TV ; ! "take"
pikirlen:pikirlen V-TV ; ! "think"
aýt:aýd V-TV ; ! "tell"
ber:ber V-TV ; ! "give"
tap:tap V-TV ; ! "find"
eşit:eşid V-TV ; ! "hear"
diňle:diňle V-TV ; ! "listen"
iý:iý V-TV ; ! "eat"
iç:iç V-TV ; ! "drink"
et:ed V-TV ; ! "do"
bak:bak V-TV ; ! ""
sora:sora V-TV ; ! ""
diý:diý V-TV ; ! "say"
söý:söý V-TV ; ! "love"
geçir:geçir V-TV ; ! "conduct, translate"
pikir% et:pikir% ed V-TV ; ! "think"
dowam% et:dowam% ed V-TV ; ! "continue" 
kabul% et:kabul% ed V-TV ; ! "accept" 
hereket% et:hereket% ed V-TV ; ! "move"
ulan:ulan V-TV ; ! "use"
döret:döred V-TV ; ! "create"
gora:gora V-TV ; ! "protect, defend"
sakla:sakla V-TV ; ! "keep, store"
ýaz:ýaz V-TV ; ! "write"
ýyk:ýyg V-TV ; ! ""
ýak:ýag V-TV ; ! ""
duş:duş V-TV ; ! "meet, encounter"
böl:böl V-TV ; ! "divide"
geç:geç V-TV ; ! "pass, begin, start"
hasaplan:hasaplan V-TV ; ! "take into account"
alyş:alyş V-TV ; ! "exchange"
başla:başla V-TV ; ! "begin"
tut:tut V-TV ; ! "hold, support"
işle:işle V-TV ; ! "operate, work"
öç:öç V-TV ; ! "extinguish"
näme%<prn%>%<itg%>%+et:näd V-TV ; ! "what to do?"
at:at V-TV ; ! "throw, put"
giriz:giriz V-TV ; ! "let in, bring in"
ýükle:ýükle V-TV ; ! "load up"
getir:getir V-TV ; ! "fetch, bring"
ýara:ýara V-TV ; ! "like"
gatnaş:gatnaş V-TV ; ! "attend"
ýuw:ýuw V-TV ; ! "wash"
göçür:göçür V-TV ; ! "move, copy" ! FIXME: +caus?
sal:sal V-TV ; ! "place, put"
aç:aç V-TV ; ! "open"
düz:düz V-TV ; ! "string, thread, gather"
ýeňil:ýeň%{u%}l V-TV ; ! "lose"
tapawutlan:tapawutlan V-TV ; ! "differ"
satyn% al:satyn% al V-TV ; ! "buy"
gura:gura V-TV ; ! "organise"
öwren:öwren V-TV ; ! "learn"
bejer:bejer V-TV ; ! "treat, repair"
çöz:çöz V-TV ; ! "untie, resolve"
tanal:tanal V-TV ; ! "introduce"
gör:gör V-TV-NOCAUS ; ! "see"
gör:görkez V-TV-CAUS ; ! "show"
syr:syr V-TV ; ! "sweep, shave"
kes:kes V-TV ; ! "cut"
çek:çek V-TV ; ! "pull, tow, ..."
oz:oz V-TV ; ! "overtake"
sat:sat V-TV ; ! "sell, betray"
bol:bol V-IV ; ! "be"
git:gid V-IV ; ! "come"
gel:gel V-IV ; ! "go"
oýna:oýna V-IV ; ! "play"
bit:bit V-IV ; ! ""
seret:sered V-IV ; ! "watch"
ylga:ylga V-IV ; ! "run"
gizlen:gizlen V-IV ; ! "hide"
sana:sana V-IV ; ! "count"
geple:geple V-IV ; ! "speak"
gepleş:gepleş V-IV ; ! "converse, talk"
ýylgyr:ýylgyr V-IV ; ! "smile"
isle:isle V-IV ; ! "want"
gez:gez V-IV ; ! "wander"
görün:görün V-IV ; ! "appear, seem"
bar:bar V-IV ; ! "come"
çap:çap V-IV ; ! "gallop, hop"
ýet:ýet V-IV ; ! "suffice"
ýerleş:ýerleş V-IV ; ! "be situated"
çyk:çyk V-IV ; ! "exit, leave"
gir:gir V-IV ; ! "enter"
düş:düş V-IV ; ! "descend, fall, come into"
gal:gal V-IV ; ! "raise, stay, remain"
ýaşa:ýaşa V-IV ; ! "live"
ugra:ugra V-IV ; ! "to set off"
göç:göç V-IV ; ! "move, go"
gaç:gaç V-IV ; ! "flee, retreat"
ýit:ýit V-IV ; ! "vanish, disappear, go missing"
uç:uç V-IV ; ! "fly, stagger"
gül:gül V-IV ; ! "laugh"
gülle:gülle V-IV ; ! "bloom"
döre:döre V-IV ; ! "arise, spring up"
ýöre:ýöre V-IV ; ! "walk, go, advance"
in:in V-IV-NOCAUS ; ! "to descend"
in:inder V-IV-CAUS ; ! "to lower"
dogul:dogul V-IV ; ! "be born"
dog:dog V-IV ; ! "rise"
öwrül:öwrül V-IV ; ! "return"
gor:gor V-IV-NOCAUS ; ! "be afraid"
gor:gorkuz V-IV-CAUS ; ! "frighten"
ak:ak V-IV-NOCAUS ; ! "flow"
ak:akyt V-IV-CAUS ; ! "make flow"
gaýt:gaýt V-IV-NOCAUS ; ! "return"
gaýt:gaýtar V-IV-CAUS ; ! "make return"
ös:ös V-IV-NOCAUS ; ! "grow"
ös:ösdür V-IV-CAUS ; ! "cultivate, grow"
ön:ön V-IV-NOCAUS ; ! "be born, produce"
ön:öndür V-IV-CAUS ; ! "produce"
öl:öl V-IV-NOCAUS ; ! "die"
öl:öldür V-IV-CAUS ; ! "kill"
mün:mün V-IV ; ! "mount"
ýok:ýok V-IV ; ! "come off, get better, be healthy"
eýer:eýer V-IV ; ! "follow, ensue, be lead"
sezewar% bol:sezewar% bol V-IV ; ! "triumph, overcome"
